Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,193
Board; seal; adopt.

The board shall adopt and have an official seal which shall be affixed
to all certificates of licensure granted and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary
for the proper performance of such duty.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 10, p. 1863;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 9.